California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Nothing in this division shall prohibit the issuance or transfer of any retail on-sale general license to any person with respect to passenger cruise ships or lines owned by, or operated by or on behalf of, the licensee, notwithstanding that a manufacturer, winegrower, manfacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler holds the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly, in the cruise ships or lines or in the retail licensee, subject to the following conditions:

(1) Not more than 10 percent of the total gross annual revenues of the cruise ships or lines is derived from the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(2) The manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler shall not influence or attempt to influence decisions concerning the purchase and sale of alcoholic beverages by the retail licensee and those decisions are made solely by the retail licensee.

(3) The retail licensee is not required, by agreement or otherwise, to exclude from sale on board its vessels competitive alcoholic beverage products.

(4) The retail licensee shall purchase no beer, wine, or distilled spirits for sale in this state other than from a wholesale licensee, and the retail licensee shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state from any wholesale licensee holding the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly, in the cruise ships or lines or in the retail licensee.

(b) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through verticle integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 804, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.20.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler may hold the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly in the premises or in the retail licensee, may serve as an officer, director, employee, or agent of that licensee, and may sponsor or fund educational programs, special fundraising and promotional events, improvements in capital projects, and the development of exhibits or facilities of and for the licensee, provided that each of the following conditions is met:

(a) The retail license is for a nonprofit school for professional chefs located in Napa County which is operated in conjunction with a bona fide eating place open to the public.

(b) The school’s educational program has been accredited by the Board of Regents of the University of California, the State Department of Education, or the Council for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education or other state-authorized accrediting commission.

(c) The number of items of beer, wine, or distilled spirits by brand offered for sale by the retail licensee, which are produced, bottled, rectified, distilled, processed, imported, or sold by the licensees holding an interest in, serving as an officer or director of, or sponsoring or funding the programs and projects of the retail licensee, does not exceed 15 percent of the total items of beer, wine, or distilled spirits by brand listed and offered for sale in the bona fide public eating place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 245, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.21.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a licensed manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of any such person, who prior to July 1, 1987, has entered into an active lease of premises to any holder of an off-sale license, may continue to lease premises or renew or otherwise modify such lease with any holder of an off-sale license so long as the lessor holds no financial interest other than such lease in the business of the lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 116, Sec. 4.   Effective May 25, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.22.

(a) Nothing in this division shall prohibit the issuance, transfer, or renewal of any retail license to any person with respect to premises which are owned by, or operated by or on behalf of, the licensee, notwithstanding that a wholesaler licensed to sell alcoholic beverages in states other than California has an interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail license or in the retail licensee, provided that each of the following conditions are met:

(1) The retail licensee shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state other than from a California wholesale licensee, and the retail licensee shall purchase no alcoholic beverages from any manufacturer or wholesale licensee holding the ownership of any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail license or in the retail licensee.

(2) Not more than 40 percent of the gross annual revenues of the retailer are derived from the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(b) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its expressed terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 412, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.23.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer or winegrower may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, an on-sale retail licensee who is the owner of a stadium with a seating capacity in excess of 3,000 seats during the use of the stadium for an annual water ski show.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 124, Sec. 1.   Effective June 7, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.24.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any manufacturer, winegrower, rectifier, distiller, distilled spirits wholesaler, or any officer, director, agent, or representative of any of those entities, may conduct market research and, in connection with that research, the entity conducting the market research may purchase from licensed off-sale retailers data regarding purchases and sales of alcoholic beverage products at the market rates that those retailers sell similar data for nonalcoholic beverage products subject to the following limitations:

(1) A licensed retailer shall not be obligated to purchase or sell the alcoholic beverage products of that manufacturer,
 winegrower, rectifier, distiller, or distilled spirits wholesaler.

(2) A retail premises shall not participate in more than one research project conducted by any single manufacturer, winegrower, rectifier, distiller, or distilled spirits wholesaler during a calendar year. A research project may involve multiple onsite surveys to gather feedback.

(3) Nothing in this section shall allow a licensed retailer to require a manufacturer, winegrower, rectifier, distiller, or distilled spirits wholesaler to conduct any market research as a condition for selling alcoholic beverage products to that licensed retailer.

(b) Any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license or winegrower’s license who, through coercion or other illegal means,
 induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a beer or wine wholesaler’s license to fulfill obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the market research or time involved in the project, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(c) Any retail licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a beer or wine wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, or holder of a winegrower’s license to fulfill obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be
 punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the market research or time involved in the project, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 294, Sec. 2.   (AB 2921)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.26.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a beer manufacturer, the holder of a winegrower’s license, a California winegrower’s agent, a manufacturer of distilled spirits, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, may purchase advertising space and time from, or on behalf of, an on-sale retail licensee subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The on-sale licensee is the owner, or is the lessee, or is a wholly owned subsidiary of the lessee, of an arena with a fixed seating capacity in excess of 10,000 seats, at least 60 percent of the use of which is for horseracing events, and which is located within Los Angeles County, Alameda County, or San Mateo County.

(2) The advertising space or time is purchased only in connection with events to be held on the premises of the arena owned or leased by the on-sale licensee.

(3) The on-sale licensee serves other brands of beer distributed by a competing beer wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the beer manufacturer, other brands of wine distributed by a competing wine wholesaler in addition to the brand produced or marketed by the winegrower or California winegrower’s agent and other brands of distilled spirits distributed by a competing distilled spirits wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the distilled spirits manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent purchasing the advertising space or time.

(b) Any purchase of advertising space or time pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer, the holder of the winegrower’s license, the California winegrower’s agent, the manufacturer of distilled spirits, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, and the on-sale licensee.

(c) Any beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, California winegrower’s agent, manufacturer of distilled spirits, or the distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces, directly or indirectly, a holder of a wholesaler’s license to fulfill the contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) Any on-sale licensee who, directly or indirectly, solicits or coerces a holder of a wholesaler’s license to solicit a beer manufacturer, a holder of a winegrower’s license, a California winegrower’s agent, a distilled spirits manufacturer, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, to purchase advertising space or time shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the advertising space or time involved in the contract, whichever is greater, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both imprisonment and fine. The person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 567, Sec. 11.   Effective October 7, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.27.

(a) Anything in this division to the contrary notwithstanding, any manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, California winegrower’s agent, distiller, bottler, importer, wholesaler, or any officer, director, agent, or representative of any such person, may provide to licensed retailers and the employees of those retailers who are involved in the business decisions of those retailers, both of the following:

(1) Food and beverages for consumption at a meeting at which the primary purpose is the discussion of business, and local ground transportation to and from those meetings.

(2) Tickets or admission to athletic activities or to other forms of entertainment, food and beverages for consumption at those activities, and local ground transportation to and from those activities.

(b) For purposes of this section, any allowable expenditure shall be for an activity for which some portion of the expenditure is deductible as a business entertainment expense under the Internal Revenue Code. The value of any food, beverage, local ground transportation, or tickets or admission to activities or other forms of entertainment provided under subdivision (a) shall not be considered the advancement of moneys or other things of value within the meaning of Sections 25500, 25502, and 25600.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   Effective July 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.28.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the holder of no more than six on-sale licenses, or any officer, director, employee, or agent of that licensee, may own a licensed beer manufacturer holding a license pursuant to Section 23357, and may serve on the board of directors and as an officer or employee of a licensed beer manufacturer. A beer manufacturer, regardless of how many beer manufacturer licenses are held by the beer manufacturer alone, under common ownership with any other licensed beer manufacturer, or under common ownership with any officer, director, employee, or agent of that beer manufacturer
 licensee who is operating as an on-sale retailer pursuant to this section, shall be prohibited from exercising alone or in common any combination of retail privileges authorized under this section and subdivision (c) of Section 23389 that would result in that beer manufacturer exercising retail privileges at more than
 eight locations, provided that, subject to the limitations of this section, no more than six of which may be on-sale licenses. This section shall not limit the number of licensed beer manufacturer locations or the exercise of retail privileges at those licensed beer manufacturer locations as authorized pursuant to Section 23357.

(b) An on-sale licensee specified in subdivision (a) shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state other than from a wholesale or winegrower licensee, except for any alcoholic beverages manufactured by the licensed beer manufacturer whose premises of production are located no more than five miles from the licensed on-sale premises.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its expressed terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 962, Sec. 3.   (AB 2307)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.29.

(a) Nothing in this division shall prohibit the issuance, transfer, or renewal of any retail on-sale license to any person with respect to premises that are either an integral part of, or adjacent to, the operations of a motion picture or television production facility or an affiliated motion picture or television theme park, which premises are owned by, or operated by or on behalf of, the licensee, notwithstanding that a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail license, or in the retail licensee, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) No more than 10 percent of the total gross annual revenues of the motion picture or television production facility and any affiliated theme park is derived from the sale of alcoholic beverages.

(2) The retail licensee shall purchase no beer, wine, or distilled spirits for sale in this state other than from a wholesale licensee, and the retail licensee shall purchase no alcoholic beverages for sale in this state from any wholesale licensee that has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail licensee, or in the retail license.

(3) The retail licensee serves other brands of beer, wine, and distilled spirits in addition to the brands manufactured or distributed by the beer or distilled spirits
 manufacturer or produced or distributed by the winegrower which has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail licensee, or in the retail license.

(4) No more than 15 percent of the retail licensee’s monetary expenditures for alcoholic beverages for sale on its licensed premises in a calendar year shall be for products manufactured or distributed by the beer or distilled spirits manufacturer or produced or distributed by the winegrower which has any interest, directly or indirectly, in the premises, in the retail licensee, or in the retail license.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Motion picture or television production facility” means an establishment where motion pictures or
 television programs are produced.

(2) “Motion picture or television theme park” means an establishment with not less than 25 contiguous acres, located in Los Angeles County, the predominant purpose of which is the
 entertainment of the public through activities related to motion pictures and television programs, that has an annual paid attendance of at least three million people.

(3) “Adjacent to” means located on commonly owned property, or contiguous to, or in close proximity.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general
 prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section shall be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 327, Sec. 16.   (SB 937)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.30.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a winegrower or one or more of its direct or indirect subsidiaries of which the winegrower owns not less than a 51-percent interest, who manufactures, produces, bottles, processes, imports, or sells wine and distilled spirits made from grape wine or other grape products only, under a winegrower’s license or any other license issued pursuant to this division, or any officer or director of, or any person holding any interest in, those persons may serve as an officer or director of, and may hold the ownership of any interest or any financial or representative relationship in, any on-sale license, or the business conducted under that license, provided that, except in the case of a holder of on-sale general licenses for airplanes and duplicate on-sale general licenses for air common carriers, all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The on-sale licensee purchases all alcoholic beverages sold and served only from California wholesale licensees.

(2) The number of wine items by brand offered for sale by the on-sale licensee that are produced, bottled, processed, imported, or sold by the licensed winegrower or by the subsidiary of which the winegrower owns not less than 51 percent, or by any officer or director of, or by any person holding any interest in, those persons does not exceed 15 percent of the total wine items by brand listed and offered for sale by the on-sale licensee selling and serving that wine. Notwithstanding paragraph (1), wine sold pursuant to this provision may be purchased from a California winegrower so long as the wine purchased is produced or bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the same licensed winegrower that holds an interest in the on-sale license and such direct sales do not involve more than two on-sale licenses in which the winegrower or any person holding an interest in the winegrower holds any interest, directly or indirectly, either individually or in combination or together with each other in the aggregate.

(3) None of the persons specified in this section may have any of the interests specified in this section in more than two on-sale licenses.

(b) The Legislature finds that, while this section provides a limited exception for licensed winegrowers, that limited exception is granted for specific purposes, and that it is also necessary and proper that licensed winegrowers maintain the authority granted under this division to sell wine and brandy to any individual consumer or any person holding a license authorizing the sale of wine or brandy.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and the Legislature intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 162, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.31.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, a California winegrower’s agent, a distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general license, a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, and a licensed retailer may make monetary contributions or alcoholic beverage contributions of the type that licensee is authorized to sell to a symphony association, if all the following conditions are met:

(1) The symphony association is a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of the United States and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and
 Taxation Code.

(2) The symphony association has been incorporated in the City and County of San Francisco by and through its predecessor organizations for not less than 99 years and produces not less than 175 musical events open to the general public per symphony season.

(3) The symphony association holds a retail on-sale license in a portion of its premises, provided that no contribution shall be used in or for the benefit of the symphony association’s retail on-sale license.

(4) The contribution shall not be conditioned directly or indirectly, in any way, on the purchase, sale, or distribution of any alcoholic beverage manufactured or distributed by the beer manufacturer, holder of a winegrower’s license, California winegrower’s agent, distilled spirits manufacturer, holder of a distilled spirits rectifiers general
 license, a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, or a licensed retailer by the symphony association.

(b) The symphony association shall serve other brands of beer distributed by a competing beer wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the contributing beer manufacturer, other brands of wine distributed by a competing wine wholesaler in addition to the brand produced or marketed by the contributing winegrower or California winegrower’s agent, and other brands of distilled spirits distributed by a competing distilled spirits wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the contribution distilled spirits manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(c) For purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes a holder of a beer manufacturer’s license, a holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or a holder of a
 beer and wine importer’s general license.

(d) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 463, Sec. 5.   (AB 1425)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.32.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 25500 and 25503, a beer manufacturer, winegrower, rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may purchase advertising space and time in connection with an on-sale retail licensed premises, if all the following conditions are met:

(1) The on-sale retail licensed premises is operated as an integral part of an opera house that was constructed in 1880, is listed in the National Register of Historic Places, and is located in the City of Napa.

(2) The administrator of the opera house is a nonprofit charitable corporation or association that is exempt from the payment of income taxes under the Internal Revenue Code of
 the United States and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(3) The advertising space and time is purchased only in connection with specific events that are conducted by and for the benefit of the nonprofit charitable corporation or association that administers the opera house and that are open to the public.

(4) All payments for the purchase of advertising space and time shall be made to the nonprofit charitable corporation or association that administers the opera house. Payments shall not be made, directly or indirectly, to the on-sale retail licensee.

(5) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), purchased advertising space and time shall not promote or be for the benefit of the on-sale retail licensee.

(B) Purchased advertising space and time may identify the on-sale retail licensed premises for purposes of identifying the venue at which the event is being held. This identification shall be relatively inconspicuous in connection with the advertisement as a whole.

(6) An agreement to purchase advertising space and time shall not require, directly or indirectly, the purchase or sale of the advertiser’s products by the on-sale retail licensee. The on-sale retail licensee shall offer for sale, in a bona fide manner, alcoholic beverages manufactured, produced, or distributed by competing licensed beer manufacturers, winegrowers, rectifiers, distilled spirits manufacturers, craft distillers, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agents.

(b) Advertising space and time purchased pursuant to this section may be included in
 printed programs for the specific event and in announcements made during the event, as well as any internet, social media, or other media promotion of the event. The advertising may also be placed on or in the on-sale retail licensed premises, or on or in unlicensed areas within the opera house operated by the on-sale retail licensee, only during the time the specific event is taking place.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to their
 express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 18.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.33.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a beer manufacturer or winegrower may provide sponsorship funds for or on behalf of a retail on-sale licensee provided each of the following conditions are met:

(1) The on-sale licensee is the owner and manager of outdoor fairs in northern and southern California which have a history-based theme and operate for 6 to 12 weekends in either or both venues and, excluding rain-outs, have an average daily attendance exceeding 10,000 persons.

(2) The sponsorship funds will be provided and used only in connection with specific programs or activities at the outdoor fairs described in paragraph (1).

(3) The sponsorship funds are to sponsor the following programs or activities only:

(i) Signing program for the deaf.

(ii) Docent program for the disabled.

(iii) Public school history program.

(iv) Scholarships and honoraria for the students of the College of Performing Arts.

(v) Contests involving sports, cooking, brewing, costumes, and other skills related to arts and sciences.

(vi) Equestrian exhibits and tournaments.

(4) The on-sale licensee serves other brands of beer or wine in addition to the brand manufactured by the beer manufacturer or produced by the winegrower providing sponsorship funds.

(b) Any provision of sponsorship funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be conducted pursuant to a written contract entered into by the beer manufacturer or winegrower and the on-sale licensee.

(c) Any beer manufacturer or winegrower who, through coercion or other illegal means, induces a beer or wine wholesaler to fulfill those contractual obligations entered into pursuant to subdivision (a), is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine in an amount equal to the entire value of the sponsorship funds involved in the contract, plus ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. This person shall also be subject to license revocation pursuant to Section 24200.

(d) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation between manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exception established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests must be limited to its express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 638, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.34.

(a) A holder of a winegrower’s license, a beer manufacturer as defined in subdivision (d), a distilled spirits rectifier, a distilled spirits manufacturer, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may donate wine, beer, or spirits, and make monetary contributions to a complex dedicated to the presentation of live artistic, musical, sports, food, beverage, culinary, lifestyle, or other cultural entertainment events or performances, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The permanent retail on-sale licensee in the complex is a nonprofit charitable corporation or association exempt from payment of income taxes under the provisions of the Internal Revenue
 Code and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 23701) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) The complex is of not more than 50 acres located on the campus of, and owned by, Sonoma State University dedicated to presenting live artistic, musical, sports, food, beverage, culinary, lifestyle, or other cultural and entertainment events and performances with venues that include a concert hall with a seating capacity of approximately 1,500 seats, a second concert hall with a seating capacity of up to 300 seats, an outdoor area with a seating capacity of up to 5,000 seats, and a further outdoor area with a seating capacity of up to 10,000 seats.

(3) The complex has a permanent retail on-sale license that is a long-term tenant of the complex.

(4) The donation or monetary contribution shall not be conditioned directly or indirectly, in any way, on the purchase, sale, or distribution of any alcoholic beverage manufactured or
 distributed by the holder of a winegrower’s license, the beer manufacturer, the distilled spirits rectifier, the distilled spirits manufacturer, or the distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent by the licensee of the complex.

(5) The permanent retail on-sale licensee in the complex shall:

(A) Serve other brands of beer distributed by a competing beer wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by a contributing beer manufacturer.

(B) Serve other brands of wine distributed by a competing wine wholesaler in addition to the brand produced or distributed by a contributing winegrower.

(C) Serve other brands of distilled spirits
 distributed by a competing distilled spirits wholesaler in addition to the brand manufactured or marketed by the contributing distilled spirits manufacturer or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent.

(6) Except as provided in paragraph (7), donated wine, beer, or spirits shall not be used or sold by the permanent retail licensee and a monetary contribution shall not be used in, or for the benefit of, the permanent retail on-sale licensee.

(7) Donated wine, beer, or spirits may only be used or sold in connection with fundraising activities held on or off the permanent licensed premises. Fundraising activities held in any area included in the licensed premises during which donated wine, beer, or spirits is used or sold shall not take place at the complex while the permanent retail
 licensee is exercising its license privileges and shall only be conducted pursuant to a temporary license issued by the department, provided however, that the permanent licensee shall surrender its license during the fundraising only for those areas of the complex where the fundraising activities are being presented and may continue to operate under its permanent license in other areas covered by the license where the fundraising is not taking place.

(b) The complex may acknowledge and thank a donating winegrower, beer manufacturer as defined in subdivision (d), distilled spirits rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent in the complex’s event programs, on the complex’s Internet Web site, and on stage at the permanent licensed premises during an event or performance.

(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation among manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “beer manufacturer” includes any holder of a beer manufacturer’s license,
 any holder of an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate, or any holder of a beer and wine importer’s general license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 315, Sec. 2.   (SB 462)   Effective September 21, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.35.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 25500 and 25503, a beer manufacturer, winegrower, rectifier, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, or a distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may purchase advertising space and time in connection with a special on-sale retail licensed premises, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The on-sale retail licensed premises is a for-profit theater licensed with a special on-sale general license pursuant to Section 24045.75.

(2) The on-sale retail licensed premises is configured with theatrical seating of at least
 1,600 seats but no more than 2,400 seats.
